Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.280

Fiscal responsibilities of state officers and employees—"State officer or employee" defined.

As used in RCW 43.88.290 and 43.88.300 the term "state officer or employee" includes the members of the governing body of any state agency, as state agency is defined in *RCW 43.88.020(4) and those generally known as executive management but excludes nonsupervisory state employees covered by civil service under chapters 41.06 and ** 28B.16 RCW.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 320 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 43.88.020 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (4) to subsection (2).

**(2) Chapter 28B.16 RCW was repealed by 1993 c 281, with the exception of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.16.240, which was recodified as RCW 41.06.382. RCW 28B.16.015 and 41.06.382 were subsequently repealed by 2002 c 354 s 403, effective July 1, 2005.

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 320: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1977." [ 1977 ex.s. c 320 s 6.]